Illinois, session 104th, SB3069.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-10 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/1-10)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-458)8    Sec. 1-10. Application. 9    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 10bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 11first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 12be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 13provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 14prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 15Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant 16entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 17instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 18solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 19July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this 20Code and its intent.21    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the 22funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal 23assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:  SB3069- 2 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1        (1) Contracts between the State and its political 2    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 3    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 4    this Code.5        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 6    Section 20-80.7        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 8    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.9        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 10    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an 11    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 12    that individual.13        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.14        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 15    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 16    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 17    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 18    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate 19    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the 20    value of the contract, and the effective date of the 21    contract.22        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated 23    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 24    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor 25    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 26    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor,   SB3069- 3 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other 2    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 3    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 4    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.5        (8) (Blank).6        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois 7    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.8        (10) (Blank). 9        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 10    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the 11    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 12    design-build agreements entered into according to the 13    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 14    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.15        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 16    professional and artistic services entered into by the 17    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 18    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through 19    a competitive process authorized by the members of the 20    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections 21    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 22    as well as the final approval by the members of the 23    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.24        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered 25    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 26    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State   SB3069- 4 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be 2    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 3    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 4    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 5    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 6    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority 7    of the terms of the contract. 8        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 9    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 10    science services in consultation with and subject to the 11    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 12    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 13    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 14    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 15    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 16    writing with justification, waive any certification 17    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 18    for services which are currently provided by members of a 19    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of 20    the collective bargaining agreement concerning 21    subcontracting shall be followed.22        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13), 23    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 24        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required 25    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 26    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.  SB3069- 5 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that 2    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 3    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 4    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 5    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 6    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations, 7    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 8    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 9    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 10    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as 11    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 12    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 13    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 14    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 15    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 16    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 17    water or wastewater waste water systems with 10,000 18    connections or less, (6) a holder as defined in Section 19    21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities 20    owning or operating utility systems consisting of public 21    utilities as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of 22    the Illinois Municipal Code. 23        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 24    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of 25    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 26    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act.   SB3069- 6 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 2    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 3    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 4    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 5    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 6    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access 7    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 8    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 9    Medical Cannabis Program Act.10        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements 11    necessary for the Department of Agriculture, the 12    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 13    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 14    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 15    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act if 16    the applicable agency has made a good faith determination 17    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 18    to fall within this exemption and if the process is 19    conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with the 20    requirements of Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5, 21    50-10, 50-10.5, 50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 22    50-36, 50-37, 50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for 23    Section 50-35, compliance applies only to contracts or 24    subcontracts over $100,000. Notice of each contract 25    entered into under this paragraph (18) that is related to 26    the procurement of goods and services identified in   SB3069- 7 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    paragraph (1) through (9) of this subsection shall be 2    published in the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar 3    days after contract execution. The Chief Procurement 4    Officer shall prescribe the form and content of the 5    notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief Procurement 6    Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and content 7    prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a report of 8    contracts that are related to the procurement of goods and 9    services identified in this subsection. At a minimum, this 10    report shall include the name of the contractor, a 11    description of the supply or service provided, the total 12    amount of the contract, the term of the contract, and the 13    exception to this Code utilized. A copy of any or all of 14    these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 15    Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 16    Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor 17    and General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year 18    that includes, at a minimum, an annual summary of the 19    monthly information reported to the Chief Procurement 20    Officer. This exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after 21    June 25, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27).22        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments, 23    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 24    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and 25    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 26    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to   SB3069- 8 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    complete the job application process and be considered for 2    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 3    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 4    qualified current employee with a disability to perform 5    the essential functions of the position held by that 6    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee 7    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 8    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 9    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 10    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public 11    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 12    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 13        For purposes of this paragraph (19):14        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 15    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 16    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 17    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 18    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.19        "Assistive technology services" means any service that 20    directly assists an individual with a disability in 21    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 22    device.23        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 24    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when 25    describing an individual with a disability. 26        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the   SB3069- 9 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party 2    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 3    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 4    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a 5    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 6    Utilities Act, or a grid auditor pursuant to Section 7    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act. 8        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 9    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 10    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 11    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 12    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 13    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining 14    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 15    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 16    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification 17    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 18    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or 19    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 20    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or 21    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 22    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 23    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 24    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 25    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 26        (22) Contracts for project management services and   SB3069- 10 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    system integration services required for the completion of 2    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 3    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 4    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by 5    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 6    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the 7    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 8    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 9    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 10    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 11        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 12    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits 13    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a 14    good faith determination that it is necessary and 15    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 16    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a 17    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 18    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 19    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 20    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This 21    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 22    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 23        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 24    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 25    announcements, and public awareness and education 26    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the   SB3069- 11 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    providers of those services that inform the public on 2    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 3        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 4    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early 5    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 6    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 7    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 8    shall only be used for products and services procured 9    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 10    procurements may include those necessary to design and 11    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 12    services. The procurements may include, but are not 13    limited to, those necessary to align and update program 14    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 15    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 16    technical assistance and professional development, design 17    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 18    implement management and operational structures, and 19    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 20    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes 21    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 22    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 23    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 24    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 25    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 26    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60   SB3069- 12 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized 2    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 3    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 4    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list 5    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 6    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and 7    after July 1, 2027. 8        (26) Procurements that are necessary for increasing 9    the recruitment and retention of State employees, 10    particularly minority candidates for employment, 11    including: 12            (A) procurements related to registration fees for 13        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;14            (B) production of recruitment materials; and15            (C) other services related to recruitment and 16        retention of State employees.17        The exemption under this paragraph (26) applies only 18    if the State agency has made a good faith determination 19    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 20    to fall within this paragraph (26). The procurement 21    process under this paragraph (26) shall be conducted in a 22    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 23    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 24    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 25    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. 26    Nothing in this paragraph (26) authorizes the replacement   SB3069- 13 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    or diminishment of State responsibilities in hiring or the 2    positions that effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) 3    is inoperative on and after June 30, 2029. 4        (27) Procurements necessary for the Department of 5    Healthcare and Family Services to implement changes to the 6    State's Integrated Eligibility System to ensure the 7    system's compliance with federal implementation mandates 8    and deadlines, if the Department of Healthcare and Family 9    Services has made a good faith determination that it is 10    necessary and appropriate for the procurement to fall 11    within this exemption. 12        (28) After exhausting the list of master contracts and 13    cooperative agreements, procurement expenditures 14    necessary for the Department of Public Health, the 15    Department of Agriculture, the Illinois State Police, or 16    the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency to operate 17    State laboratories. 18    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts 19with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or 20after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any 21paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 22or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate 23procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 24of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the 25contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 26Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a   SB3069- 14 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 2November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 3annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 4chief procurement officer. 5    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 6procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the 7Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 8Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 9technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 10Illinois Power Agency Act. 11    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 12and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois 13Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 14procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 15Illinois Lottery Law. 16    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 17Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to 18assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related 19to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield 20facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 21Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 22of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range 23of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 24costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the 25construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 26full duration of construction.  SB3069- 15 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    (f) (Blank). 2    (g) (Blank).3    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 4contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and 511-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 6    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records 7necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 8expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 9Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 10privilege. 11    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 12Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works 13of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 14Board Act. 15    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 16contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 17Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers 18appointed pursuant to the Election Code. 19    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the 20Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and 21services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 22Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private 23funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 24Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon. 25    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 26funds with which contracts are paid, including federal   SB3069- 16 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 2Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 3necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 4Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of 5the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 6Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 7(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 6-27-23; 8103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, eff. 96-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, 10eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25) 11    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-458)12    Sec. 1-10. Application. 13    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 14bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 15first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 16be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 17provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 18prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 19Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant 20entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 21instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 22solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 23July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this 24Code and its intent.25    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the   SB3069- 17 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal 2assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:3        (1) Contracts between the State and its political 4    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 5    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 6    this Code.7        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 8    Section 20-80.9        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 10    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.11        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 12    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an 13    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 14    that individual.15        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.16        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 17    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 18    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 19    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 20    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate 21    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the 22    value of the contract, and the effective date of the 23    contract.24        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated 25    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 26    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor   SB3069- 18 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 2    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor, 3    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other 4    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 5    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 6    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.7        (8) (Blank).8        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois 9    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.10        (10) (Blank). 11        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 12    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the 13    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 14    design-build agreements entered into according to the 15    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 16    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.17        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 18    professional and artistic services entered into by the 19    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 20    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through 21    a competitive process authorized by the members of the 22    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections 23    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 24    as well as the final approval by the members of the 25    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.26        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered   SB3069- 19 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 2    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State 3    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be 4    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 5    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 6    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 7    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 8    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority 9    of the terms of the contract. 10        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 11    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 12    science services in consultation with and subject to the 13    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 14    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 15    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 16    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 17    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 18    writing with justification, waive any certification 19    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 20    for services which are currently provided by members of a 21    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of 22    the collective bargaining agreement concerning 23    subcontracting shall be followed.24        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13), 25    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 26        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required   SB3069- 20 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 2    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.3        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that 4    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 5    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 6    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 7    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 8    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations, 9    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 10    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 11    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 12    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as 13    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 14    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 15    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 16    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 17    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 18    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 19    water or wastewater waste water systems with 10,000 20    connections or less, (6) a holder as defined in Section 21    21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities 22    owning or operating utility systems consisting of public 23    utilities as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of 24    the Illinois Municipal Code. 25        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 26    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of   SB3069- 21 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 2    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act. 3        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 4    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 5    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 6    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 7    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 8    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access 9    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 10    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 11    Medical Cannabis Program Act.12        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements 13    necessary for the Department of Agriculture, the 14    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 15    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 16    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 17    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act if 18    the applicable agency has made a good faith determination 19    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 20    to fall within this exemption and if the process is 21    conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with the 22    requirements of Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5, 23    50-10, 50-10.5, 50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 24    50-36, 50-37, 50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for 25    Section 50-35, compliance applies only to contracts or 26    subcontracts over $100,000. Notice of each contract   SB3069- 22 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    entered into under this paragraph (18) that is related to 2    the procurement of goods and services identified in 3    paragraph (1) through (9) of this subsection shall be 4    published in the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar 5    days after contract execution. The Chief Procurement 6    Officer shall prescribe the form and content of the 7    notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief Procurement 8    Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and content 9    prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a report of 10    contracts that are related to the procurement of goods and 11    services identified in this subsection. At a minimum, this 12    report shall include the name of the contractor, a 13    description of the supply or service provided, the total 14    amount of the contract, the term of the contract, and the 15    exception to this Code utilized. A copy of any or all of 16    these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 17    Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 18    Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor 19    and General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year 20    that includes, at a minimum, an annual summary of the 21    monthly information reported to the Chief Procurement 22    Officer. This exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after 23    June 25, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27).24        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments, 25    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 26    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and   SB3069- 23 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 2    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to 3    complete the job application process and be considered for 4    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 5    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 6    qualified current employee with a disability to perform 7    the essential functions of the position held by that 8    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee 9    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 10    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 11    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 12    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public 13    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 14    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 15        For purposes of this paragraph (19):16        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 17    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 18    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 19    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 20    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.21        "Assistive technology services" means any service that 22    directly assists an individual with a disability in 23    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 24    device.25        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 26    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when   SB3069- 24 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    describing an individual with a disability. 2        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 3    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party 4    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 5    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 6    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a 7    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 8    Utilities Act, a grid auditor pursuant to Section 9    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act, a facilitator, 10    expert, or consultant pursuant to Sections 16-126.2 and 11    16-202 of the Public Utilities Act, a procurement monitor 12    pursuant to Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities Act, 13    an ombudsperson pursuant to Section 20-145 of the Public 14    Utilities Act, or consultants and experts pursuant to 15    Section 5-15 of the Utility Data Access Act. 16        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 17    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 18    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 19    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 20    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 21    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining 22    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 23    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 24    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification 25    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 26    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or   SB3069- 25 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 2    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or 3    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 4    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 5    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 6    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 7    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 8        (22) Contracts for project management services and 9    system integration services required for the completion of 10    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 11    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 12    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by 13    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 14    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the 15    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 16    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 17    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 18    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 19        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 20    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits 21    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a 22    good faith determination that it is necessary and 23    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 24    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a 25    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 26    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A   SB3069- 26 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 2    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This 3    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 4    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 5        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 6    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 7    announcements, and public awareness and education 8    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the 9    providers of those services that inform the public on 10    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 11        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 12    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early 13    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 14    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 15    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 16    shall only be used for products and services procured 17    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 18    procurements may include those necessary to design and 19    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 20    services. The procurements may include, but are not 21    limited to, those necessary to align and update program 22    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 23    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 24    technical assistance and professional development, design 25    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 26    implement management and operational structures, and   SB3069- 27 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 2    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes 3    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 4    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 5    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 6    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 7    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 8    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60 9    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized 10    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 11    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 12    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list 13    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 14    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and 15    after July 1, 2027. 16        (26) Procurements that are necessary for increasing 17    the recruitment and retention of State employees, 18    particularly minority candidates for employment, 19    including: 20            (A) procurements related to registration fees for 21        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;22            (B) production of recruitment materials; and23            (C) other services related to recruitment and 24        retention of State employees.25        The exemption under this paragraph (26) applies only 26    if the State agency has made a good faith determination   SB3069- 28 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 2    to fall within this paragraph (26). The procurement 3    process under this paragraph (26) shall be conducted in a 4    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 5    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 6    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 7    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. 8    Nothing in this paragraph (26) authorizes the replacement 9    or diminishment of State responsibilities in hiring or the 10    positions that effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) 11    is inoperative on and after June 30, 2029. 12        (27) Procurements necessary for the Department of 13    Healthcare and Family Services to implement changes to the 14    State's Integrated Eligibility System to ensure the 15    system's compliance with federal implementation mandates 16    and deadlines, if the Department of Healthcare and Family 17    Services has made a good faith determination that it is 18    necessary and appropriate for the procurement to fall 19    within this exemption. 20        (28) After exhausting the list of master contracts and 21    cooperative agreements, procurement expenditures 22    necessary for the Department of Public Health, the 23    Department of Agriculture, the Illinois State Police, or 24    the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency to operate 25    State laboratories. 26    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts   SB3069- 29 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or 2after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any 3paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 4or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate 5procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 6of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the 7contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 8Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a 9report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 10November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 11annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 12chief procurement officer. 13    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 14procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the 15Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 16Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 17technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 18Illinois Power Agency Act. 19    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 20and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois 21Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 22procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 23Illinois Lottery Law. 24    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 25Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to 26assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related   SB3069- 30 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield 2facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 3Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 4of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range 5of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 6costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the 7construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 8full duration of construction.9    (f) (Blank). 10    (g) (Blank).11    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 12contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and 1311-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 14    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records 15necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 16expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 17Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 18privilege. 19    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 20Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works 21of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 22Board Act. 23    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 24contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 25Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers 26appointed pursuant to the Election Code.   SB3069- 31 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the 2Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and 3services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 4Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private 5funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 6Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon. 7    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 8funds with which contracts are paid, including federal 9assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 10Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 11necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 12Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of 13the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 14Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 15(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 6-27-23; 16103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, eff. 176-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, 18eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-458, eff. 6-1-26; 19revised 1-12-26.) 20    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 21changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 22that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 23represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 24not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 25made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other   SB3069- 32 -LRB104 20173 HLH 33624 b1Public Act.